Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5317
Federal grants; director; powers.

The director may obligate and administer federal grants for construction of safe drinking water projects pursuant to the Safe Drinking Water Act.

Laws 1997, LB 517, § 6.